Arkansas, session 2025, HB1209.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 24, Chapter 8, Subchapter 1, is amended
to add additional sections to read as follows:
24-8-102. Benefit provisions — Subjection of annuity rights to process
of law.
(a) The right of a person to an annuity, the annuity itself, the
return of accumulated contributions, any other right accrued or accruing
under § 24-8-201 et seq., or § 24-8-701 et seq., and all moneys belonging to
a plan shall not be subject to execution, garnishment, attachment, the
operation of bankruptcy or insolvency laws, or any other process of law and
shall be unassignable except as specifically provided in this chapter.
(b) An exception to the prohibition against the subjection of annuity
rights to process of law applies to the following:
(1) An employer or entity charged with appropriating funds for
*LJH046*
01/23/2025 9:55:01 AM LJH046

HB1209
court expenses shall have the right of setoff for a claim arising from
embezzlement or fraud committed by a member, retiree, or beneficiary; and
(2) A court of competent jurisdiction of this state may order
the monthly benefit of a retiree to be paid into the registry of the court
for disposition as the court deems just and proper if the retiree is found by
the court to be willfully refusing or failing to support his or her minor
dependent children in violation of a court order providing for that support.

24-8-103. Correction of errors.
(a) If any change or error in the records of the Arkansas Judicial
Retirement System results in a person receiving more or less than he or she
would have been entitled to receive from the system had the records been
correct, the Executive Director of the Arkansas Judicial Retirement System
shall:
(1) Correct the error; and
(2) Adjust the payment in a manner that allows the actuarial
equivalent of the benefit that the person was entitled to be paid, to the
extent it is equitable and practicable.
(b)(1) The system shall have the right to recover any overpayment that
a person may have received from funds of the system, provided that the
overpayment is determined, and the person is notified within five (5) years
of the date of the last overpayment.
(2) If the overpayment is determined at a date later than five
(5) years after the date of the last overpayment, the overpayment shall not
be recouped by the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Judicial Retirement
System unless the overpayment was a result of an error caused or created
through the intentional nondisclosure, fraud, misrepresentation, or gross
negligence by the person receiving the overpayment.
(3) In all instances where an overpayment is determined, any
subsequent payments shall be adjusted to the correct amount.
(c) If it is determined that a person has received an underpayment
from the funds of the system, regardless of the date of the determination:
(1) The system shall pay in a lump sum to the person the total
of any underpayments made before the date of the determination; and
(2) Any subsequent payments shall be adjusted to the correct
amount.
01/23/2025 9:55:01 AM LJH046

HB1209

SECTION 2. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the provisions of the Arkansas
Code related to subjection of annuity rights to process of law and correction
of errors that result in underpayments or overpayments of benefits under the
Arkansas Judicial Retirement System are in need of revision in order to
provide clarity and increase efficiency of the system; that the revisions in
this act are immediately necessary in order to allow the Arkansas Judicial
Retirement System to administer benefits in a fair and accurate manner
amongst all participants; and that this act is immediately necessary to
achieve the goals of the Arkansas Judicial Retirement System to safeguard and
maintain an orderly system of benefits. Therefore, an emergency is declared
to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of
the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on:
(1) The date of its approval by the Governor;
(2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor,
the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the
bill; or
(3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is
overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.
















01/23/2025 9:55:01 AM LJH046